Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-114
Testamentary conveyance to the heirs or next of kin of the conveyor; doctrine of worthier title abolished.

When any property is limited, mediately or immediately, in an otherwise effective testamentary conveyance, in form or in effect, to the heirs or next of kin of the conveyor, or to a person or persons who on the death of the conveyor are some or all of his heirs or next of kin, such conveyees acquire the property by purchase and not by descent.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 14, p. 597;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1014;

R.S.1943, § 76-114.